Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 29 Compensation of Employees of State
Institutions Who Contract
Tuberculosis or Infectious Hepatitis

Cross references.

Workers’ compensation generally, T. 34, C. 9.

31-29-1.
Amount of compensation.

Any employee of any state institution, agency, or department charged with the care, treatment, or diagnosis of persons infected with tuberculosis or infectious hepatitis who contracts tuberculosis or infectious hepatitis while employed by such institution, agency, or department may be carried on the payroll of such institution, agency, or department at one-half of his total compensation or $150.00 per month, whichever is less, for the duration of his disability due to tuberculosis or infectious hepatitis, not to exceed 350 weeks. In the event of death of the employee while receiving compensation under this Code section, such compensation shall immediately cease.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 513, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-2401, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 737, § 1.

31-29-2.
Physical examination required for compensation under Code Section 31-29-1.

In order for any employee of any state institution, agency, or department to be eligible to receive compensation under Code Section 31-29-1, he shall undergo a physical examination at the beginning of or during the course of his employment, which examination must show that he is free of tuberculosis or infectious hepatitis at the time of physical examination.

All physical examinations conducted pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall be provided free of charge by the institution, agency, or department employing the person.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 513, §§ 2, 3; Code 1933, §§ 88-2402, 88-2403, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 737, § 1.

31-29-3.
Periodic physical examinations of persons receiving compensation.

Any institution, agency, or department having employees qualifying for compensation under Code Section 31-29-1 may require periodic physical examinations of such employees to determine if each such employee has recovered sufficiently to resume his duties without danger of spreading the infection. If an employee is found to have recovered sufficiently, he must forthwith return to his duties. In the event of failure to do so, he shall be removed from the payroll of the institution, agency, or department.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 513, § 4; Code 1933, § 88-2404, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 737, § 1.

31-29-4.
Effect of retirement under Chapter 2 of Title 47.

If an employee of any state institution, agency, or department elects to retire under the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, if eligible to do so at the time it is ascertained that he has contracted tuberculosis or infectious hepatitis, the compensation authorized under Code Section 31-29-1 shall not be paid.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 513, § 5; Code 1933, § 88-2405, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 737, § 1.

31-29-5.
Contributions to retirement system where employee does not retire.

In the event the employee is not eligible or does not elect to retire under the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, if eligible to do so after contracting tuberculosis or infectious hepatitis, the state institution, agency, or department by which he is employed shall continue to make contributions to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, based on the employee’s total or reduced compensation, for the duration of his illness, not to exceed a maximum of 350 weeks. The employee may elect to continue his contributions to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia based on his total compensation or on the reduced compensation received from the institution, agency, or department. The retirement credits and benefits of an employee receiving compensation under Code Section 31-29-1 shall be based upon the compensation elected and contributed on by the employee.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 513, § 6; Code 1933, § 88-2406, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 737, § 1.

31-29-6.
Rights of employees under State Personnel Administration.

Any employee of any state institution, agency, or department who qualifies under Code Section 31-29-1 shall be given credit for all salary adjustments and the same eligibility for step increases to which he or she would have been entitled under the rules of the State Personnel Board had he or she not contracted tuberculosis or infectious hepatitis and had he or she remained on the job full time in the same capacity and with the same status as he or she had previously attained.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 513, § 7; Code 1933, § 88-2407, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 737, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-42/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

31-29-7.
Rules and regulations of employing authority; exclusion from right to compensation of employees not subject to exposure.

The superintendent or director having the legal authority to appoint employees of any state institution, agency, or department affected by Code Section 31-29-1 is authorized to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations not inconsistent with Code Sections 31-29-1 through 31-29-6, to effectuate and carry out the intent and purpose of this chapter. Such superintendent or director may exclude from the coverage of Code Section 31-29-1 the employees of divisions or units of the institution, agency, or department who, in the opinion of the superintendent or director, have no occupational exposure to tuberculosis or infectious hepatitis.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 513, § 9; Code 1933, § 88-2409, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 737, § 1.

31-29-8.
Specific inclusion of employees of certain institutions.

It is declared to be the specific intent of Code Section 31-29-1 that the employees of the Central State Hospital, Northwest Georgia Regional Hospital, and Reidsville State Prison be covered by Code Sections 31-29-1 through 31-29-7. This Code section shall not be construed to exclude the employees of any other state institution, agency, or department charged with the care, treatment, or diagnosis of persons infected with tuberculosis or infectious hepatitis who are subject to occupational exposure to tuberculosis or infectious hepatitis.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 513, § 10; Code 1933, § 88-2410, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 737, § 1.